Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2449
Sale of excess capacity; joint projects; authorized.

(1) An agency may sell or exchange excess capacity of any project or any excess water, electrical energy or power, energy source, or fuel, produced or owned by the agency not required by any of the participating municipalities. An agency may make such sale to any person for such consideration and for such period and upon such terms and conditions as the agency may determine, except that no such agency shall sell or exchange excess capacity of power or energy at retail, within the State of Nebraska.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 or any other statute, nothing shall prohibit an agency from undertaking any project in conjunction with or owning any project jointly with any person.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 49.